test/src/morphology/N-appinj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - appiņ: # Noun 240 'eng hop cone /est humalakäbi/fin' - full paradigm
     appiņ+N+Sg+Nom: appiņ
     appiņ+N+Sg+Gen: appiņ
     appiņ+N+Sg+Par: appiņt
     appiņ+N+Sg+Dat: appiņõn
     appiņ+N+Sg+Ins: appiņõks
     appiņ+N+Sg+Ill: appiņõ
     appiņ+N+Sg+Ela: appiņšt
     appiņ+N+Pl+Nom: appiņd
     appiņ+N+Pl+Gen: appiņd
     appiņ+N+Pl+Par: appiņi
     appiņ+N+Pl+Dat: appiņdõn
     appiņ+N+Pl+Ins: appiņdõks
     appiņ+N+Pl+Ill: appiņiž
     appiņ+N+Pl+Ela: appiņist
